Louisiana, session 2026, HB831.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1930 and 1930.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1930. Prohibited pricing practices in property damage claims; offense
A. This Section applies only to claims for property damage under a policy
of property and casualty insurance, excluding automobile or health insurance claims.
B. A person commits an offense if:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1113 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 831
(1) The person knowingly or intentionally charges two different prices for
providing a substantially similar scope of work under comparable conditions in
connection with a property damage claim, and
(2) The higher price charged is based primarily on the fact that an insurer
will pay all or part of the price of the product or service.
C. This Section does not apply to:
(1) Prices or rates established pursuant to a written contract or agreement
between the person providing the product or service and the insurer including but not
limited to preferred vendor programs, managed repair networks, or other negotiated
arrangements where the insurer and provider have agreed to specific pricing terms
in exchange for volume, quality assurances, or other considerations.
(2) Adjustments to prices based on verifiable differences in the scope of
work, materials, labor, or other factors not primarily related to insurer involvement.
D. An offense pursuant to this Section is a fraudulent insurance act pursuant
to R.S. 22:1923 and the violator shall be subject to the additional penalties,
enforcement, and reporting requirements provided in this Part, including referral to
the commissioner for administrative action, such as license suspension or revocation,
and civil penalties as authorized pursuant to R.S. 22:1924.
E. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section, including guidelines for
distinguishing prohibited practices from legitimate negotiated arrangements.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create or imply a private
cause of action.
§1930.1. Inconsistent or selective pricing by insurers in property damage claims;
unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices
A. This Section applies only to claims for property damage under a policy
of property and casualty insurance, excluding claims under automobile insurance
policies or health insurance policies.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1113 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 831
B. Committing or performing with such frequency as to indicate a general
business practice any of the following shall be an unfair method of competition and
an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance pursuant to R.S.
22:1964:
(1) Relying primarily on a pricing database, estimating software, or similar
tool for determining repair or replacement costs in adjusting a property damage
claim; and
(2) Materially and inconsistently deviating from the database or tool by
applying lower pricing from alternative sources, without consistent application or
without documented justification based on verifiable market data, such as
comparable local quotes or supplier pricing applicable to the claim location and
scope of work.
C. This Section shall not prohibit:
(1) Adjustments to claim estimates based on independent appraisals,
engineering reports, verifiable local market conditions, or other relevant evidence.
(2) Use of preferred vendor programs or negotiated rates as provided in R.S.
22:1930(C), provided such programs apply consistent pricing methodologies.
(3) Good faith negotiations with policyholders or their representatives to
resolve disputes over pricing or estimates.
D. Violations of this Section shall be subject to the enforcement provisions
of R.S. 22:1961 et seq., including but not limited to cease and desist orders,
monetary penalties, license suspension or revocation, and any other remedies
available for unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance.
E. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement this Section, including requirements for documentation
of pricing adjustments and standards for determining when practices occur with such
frequency as to indicate a general business practice.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create or imply a private
cause of action.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1113 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 831
Section 2. R.S. 37:2160.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2160.1. Prohibited pricing practices in property damage claims; applicability to
contractors
A. In addition to the prohibited acts provided in this Chapter, a licensed
contractor or subcontractor shall not engage in any practice prohibited by R.S.
22:1930 in connection with a property damage claim.
B. A violation of this Section shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the
State Licensing Board for Contractors, including but not limited to fines, suspension,
or revocation of license, as provided in R.S. 37:2156.1 and 37:2159.
C. This Section shall not be construed to prohibit or hinder preferred vendor
arrangements, managed repair programs, or other contractual agreements between
contractors and insurers that comply with R.S. 22:1930(C).